Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRAFFIC CALMING INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation for grants to cities of the first class for traffic calming infrastructure improvements. The commissioner must distribute the grant aid as follows: new text end new text begin (1) 50 percent of the funds proportionally based on each city's share of population, according to the last federal decennial census, compared to the total population of all cities of the first class; and new text end new text begin (2) 50 percent of the funds proportionally based on each city's share of money needs, as determined under Minnesota Statutes, section 162.13, subdivision 2, compared to the total money needs of all cities of the first class. new text end new text begin This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Eligible improvements include but are not limited to horizontal and vertical deflection elements, intersection improvements, paint, curb bump-outs, bollards, raised crosswalks, or other improvements to improve traffic safety in the right-of-way. Improvements made on nonmunicipal state-aid streets do not need to meet municipal state-aid streets standards. new text end